Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-710.10
Sickness and accident insurance; nonstandard provisions; requirements.

No policy provision which is not subject to sections 44-710.03 and 44-710.04 shall make a policy of sickness and accident insurance, or any portion thereof, less favorable in any respect to the insured or the beneficiary than the provisions thereof which are subject to sections 44-709 to 44-767.

Laws 1957, c. 188, § 11, p. 657;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 140.